North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 1. In General.

§ 108A-24.
Definitions.

As used in Chapter 108A:

“Applicant” is any person who requests assistance or on whose behalf assistance is requested.

(1a)

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 21.52.

(1b)

“Community service” means work exchanged for temporary public assistance.

(1c)

“County block grant” means federal and State money appropriated to implement and maintain a county’s Work First Program.

(1d)

“County department of social services” means a county department of social services, consolidated human services agency, or other local agency designated to administer services pursuant to this Article.

(1e)

“County Plan” is the biennial Work First Program plan prepared by each Electing County pursuant to this Article and submitted to the Department for incorporation into the State Plan that also includes the Standard Work First Program.

“Department” is the Department of Health and Human Services, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

“Dependent child” is a person 17 years of age or younger or, in the medical assistance program, a person under 19 years of age. A child 18 years of age, if in high school and expected to graduate by his or her 19th birthday, may receive Work First benefits through the month he or she turns 19 years of age or graduates from high school, whichever comes first.

(3a)

“Electing County” means a county that elects to develop and is approved to administer a local Work First Program.

(3b)

“Employment” means work that requires either a contribution to FICA or the filing of a State N.C. Form D-400, or the equivalent.

(3c)

“Family” means a unit consisting of a minor child or children and one or more of their biological parents, adoptive parents, stepparents, or grandparents living together. For purposes of the Work First Program, family also includes a blood or half-blood relative or adoptive relative limited to brother, sister, great-grandparent, great-great-grandparent, uncle, aunt, great-uncle, great-aunt, great-great-uncle, great-great-aunt, nephew, niece, first cousin, stepbrother, and stepsister.

(3d)

“Federal TANF funds” means the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant funds provided for in Title IV-A of the Social Security Act.

(3e)

“Fee-for-service program” means a payment model for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs operated by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to its authority under Part 6 and Part 8 of Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes in which the Department pays enrolled providers for services provided to Medicaid and NC Health Choice recipients rather than contracting for the coverage of services through a capitated payment arrangement.

(3f)

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 1, effective August 26, 2009.

(3g)

“FICA” means the taxes imposed by the Federal Insurance Contribution Act, 26 U.S.C. § 3101, et seq.

(3h)

“Full-time employment” means employment which requires the employee to work a regular schedule of hours per day and days per week established as the standard full-time workweek by the employer, but not less than an average of 30 hours per week.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 14, s. 3.

(4a)

“Mutual Responsibility Agreement” (“MRA”) is an agreement between a county and a recipient of Work First Program assistance which describes the conditions for eligibility for the assistance and what the county will provide to assist the recipient in moving from assistance to self-sufficiency. A MRA may provide for recipient parental responsibilities and child development goals and what a county or the State will provide to assist the recipient in achieving those child development goals. Improvement in literacy shall be a part of any MRA, but a recipient shall not be penalized if unable to achieve improvement. A MRA is a prerequisite for any Work First Program assistance under this Article.

(4b)

“Parent” means biological parent or adoptive parent, and for Work First purposes, includes a stepparent.

(4c)

“Prepaid health plan” or “PHP” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 108D-1

.

“Recipient” is a person to whom, or on whose behalf, assistance is granted under this Article.

“Resident,” unless otherwise defined by federal regulation, is a person who is living in North Carolina at the time of application with the intent to remain permanently or for an indefinite period; or who is a person who enters North Carolina seeking employment or with a job commitment.

“Secretary” is the Secretary of Health and Human Services, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

“Standard Program County” means a county that participates in the Standard Work First Program.

“Standard Work First Program” means the Work First Program developed by the Department.

“State Plan” is the biennial Work First Program plan, based upon the aggregate of the Electing County Plans and the Standard Work First Program, prepared by the Department for the State’s Work First Program pursuant to this Article, and submitted sequentially to the Budget Director, to the General Assembly, to the Governor, and to the appropriate federal officials for approval.

“Temporary” is a time period, not to exceed 60 cumulative months, which meets the federal requirement of Title IV-A.

“Title IV-A” means the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601, et seq., as amended by the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, P.L. 104-193, as further amended by the Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, P.L. 109-171 and to other provisions of federal law as may apply to assistance provided in this Article.

“Work” is lawful activity exchanged for cash, goods, uses, or services.

“Work First Diversion Assistance” is a short-term cash payment that is intended to substantially reduce the likelihood of a family requiring Work First Family Assistance. Work First Diversion Assistance must be used to address a specific family crisis or episode of need and may not be used for ongoing or recurrent needs. Work First Diversion Assistance is limited to once in a 12-month period.

“Work First Family Assistance” is a program of time-limited periodic payments to assist in maintaining the children of eligible families while the adult family members engage in activities to prepare for entering and to enter the workplace.

“Work First Program” is the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program established in this Article.

“Work First Program assistance” means the goods or services provided under the Work First Program.

“Work First Services” are services funded from appropriations made pursuant to this Article and designed to facilitate the purposes of the Work First Program.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1983, c. 14, s. 3; 1997-443, ss. 11A.118(a), 12.2; 2001-424, s. 21.52; 2009-489, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to who is a permanently and totally disabled person, see

G.S. 108A-42

.

As to suspension of public assistance benefits for probation violations, see G.S. 15A-1345(a1).

§ 108A-25.
Creation of programs; assumption by federally recognized tribe of programs.

The following programs of public assistance are established, and shall be administered by the county department of social services or the Department of Health and Human Services under federal regulations or under rules adopted by the Social Services Commission and under the supervision of the Department of Human Resources:

Repealed by S.L. 1997-443, s. 12.3, effective August 28, 1997.

State-county special assistance.

Food and Nutrition Services.

Foster care and adoption assistance payments.

Low income energy assistance program.

The program of medical assistance is established as a program of public assistance and shall be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with

G.S. 108A-54

. Medicaid eligibility administration may be delegated to the county departments of social services under rules adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services.

(b1)

The Work First Program is established as a program of public assistance and shall be supervised and administered as provided in Part 2 of this Article.

The Department of Health and Human Services may accept all grants-in-aid for programs of public assistance which may be available to the State by the federal government. The provisions of this Article shall be liberally construed in order that the State and its citizens may benefit fully from the federal grants-in-aid.

Each Community Care network organization designated by the Department of Health and Human Services as responsible for coordinating the health care of individuals eligible for medical assistance in a county is hereby deemed to be a public agency that is a local unit of government for the sole and limited purpose of all grants-in-aid, public assistance grant programs, and other funding programs.

When any federally recognized Native American tribe within the State assumes responsibility for any social services, Medicaid and NC Health Choice healthcare benefit programs, and ancillary services, including Medicaid administrative and service functions, that are otherwise the responsibility of a county under State law, then, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the county shall be relieved of the legal responsibility related to the tribe’s assumption of those services. With respect to a tribe’s assumption of any responsibilities for administration of any aspects of the NC Medicaid program, NC Health Choice, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), the State and the tribe shall execute an agreement to set forth the general terms, definitions, and conditions by which the parties shall operate. The agreement shall also include requirements and procedures regarding the allocation of all federal and other funds for all programs to be administered by the tribe. Upon the execution of the agreement, to allow the tribe to assume certain duties and responsibilities for the administration of the NC Medicaid program, NC Health Choice, and SNAP, the agreement between the State and the tribe shall require the tribe to accept the oversight authority of the State and the Department of Health and Human Services (Department) in the administration and supervision of these programs. In addition to the other necessary terms and conditions, the agreement shall include the following conditions:

All requirements as prescribed by federal law, as well as the tribe and State’s responsibilities in complying with federal law, including, but not limited to, any specific provisions pertaining to accounting and auditing compliance, maintenance of liability insurance, confidentiality, reporting requirements, indemnity, waiver of immunity, or due process.

As the Department is the federally recognized single State agency for the NC Medicaid program, NC Health Choice, and SNAP, provisions stating the Department retains ultimate administrative discretion in the administration interpretation of all applicable policies, rules, and regulations regarding application processing, eligibility determinations and redeterminations, and other functions related to the eligibility process.

Provisions by the tribe to ensure that individuals who will be responsible for the tribe’s duties and responsibilities under this agreement shall be employed under standards equivalent to current standards for a Merit System of Personnel Administration or any standards later prescribed by the Office of Personnel Management under section 208 of the Intergovernmental Personnel Act of 1970, unless an exemption is obtained from the federal government. The tribe shall also provide the Department with information to verify the unemployment standards included under this condition.

Requirements and procedures for allocating to the tribe in a timely manner all federal funds, nonfederal matching funds, and State funds for State programs previously borne by the State. However, requirements and procedures for allocating funds pursuant to this subdivision shall not include any funding the tribe receives directly from federal agencies.

The Department shall, when possible and as allowed by the federal government, adopt funding flexibility for Indian Health Services when such flexibility furthers goals addressing health disparities among American Indians.

History.

1937, c. 135, s. 1; c. 288, ss. 3, 31; 1949, c. 1038, s. 2; 1955, c. 1044, s. 1; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1965, c. 1173, s. 1; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1975, c. 92, s. 4; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 9; 1979, c. 702, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, ss. 11A.118(a), 11A.122, 12.3; 2004-203, s. 41; 2007-97, s. 3; 2010-31, s. 10.19A(b); 2014-100, s. 12C.3(c); 2015-241, s. 12C.10(a); 2017-57, s. 11H.22(a).

School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 6.24, provides for the development and implementation of a School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. See note at

G.S. 115C-105.20

.

Deploy Child Welfare Component of NC FAST.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9I.15(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Funds transferred from the Medicaid Transformation Reserve and allocated in Section 9B.2 of this act shall be used by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), to resume deployment of the North Carolina Families Accessing Services through Technology (NC FAST) system as it relates to case management functionality for child welfare. The Division shall deploy the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system statewide before October 1, 2022, as recommended in the Department of Health and Human Services' “Child Welfare Request for Information and Child Welfare Case Management Legislative Report,” dated September 14, 2020, and the Program Evaluation Division's Report, “NC FAST Child Welfare Case Management Software Demonstrates Adequate Functionality but Poor Usability,” dated June 12, 2020.

“(b) The Division of Social Services (Division) shall release a request for proposal (RFP) for at least one significant augmentation to the child welfare component of the NC FAST system within 30 days from the date the Division receives federal approval of its procurement plan. The Division shall enter into a contract to augment and enhance the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system within 150 days of releasing the RFP. The contract shall align with the recommendations developed by the Executive Advisory Committee within the Department, with consideration given to software currently deployed by county departments of social services.

“(b1) Of the funds allocated in accordance with this section to the Division for the child welfare component of the NC FAST system, the sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium shall be used to ensure that the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system includes the capability to automate licensing and placements, including external portals for persons applying to be foster care families and for kinship navigator programs, to:

“(1) Increase the number of foster families in North Carolina.

“(2) Expedite the licensing process.

“(3) Assist with meeting the requirements associated with the Family First Prevention Services Act.

“The Division shall release an RFP to automate licensing and placements for the child welfare component of the NC FAST system, enter into a contract for the automation, and ensure that the contract aligns with recommendations developed by the Executive Advisory Committee consistent with the time lines and requirements described in subsection (b) of this section.

“(c) Upon enactment of this section, Part III-N of S.L. 2019-240 is repealed.”

§ 108A-25.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 21.52, effective July 1, 2001.

§ 108A-25.1A.
Responsibility for errors.

A county department of social services shall be financially responsible for the erroneous issuance of Medicaid benefits and Medicaid claims payments resulting when the county department of social services takes any action that requires payment of Medicaid claims for an ineligible individual, for ineligible dates, or in an amount that includes a recipient’s liability and for which the State cannot claim federal participation.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a county department of social services shall not be financially responsible for the erroneous issuance of Medicaid benefits and Medicaid claims payments resulting from a failure or error attributable solely to the State.

The amounts to be charged back to a county department of social services for erroneous payments of claims shall be the State and federal shares of all erroneous payments, not to exceed the lesser of the amount of actual error or claims payment.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.22(f).

§ 108A-25.2.
Exemption from limitations for individuals convicted of certain drug-related felonies.

Individuals convicted of Class H or I controlled substance felony offenses in this State shall be eligible to participate in the Work First Program and the food and nutrition services program:

Six months after release from custody if no additional controlled substance felony offense is committed during that period and successful completion of or continuous active participation in a required substance abuse treatment program determined appropriate by the area mental health authority; or

If not committed to custody, six months after the date of conviction if no additional controlled substance felony offense is committed during that period and successful completion of or continuous active participation in a required substance abuse treatment program determined appropriate by the area mental health authority.

A county department of social services shall require individuals who are eligible for Work First Program assistance and electronic food and nutrition benefits pursuant to this section to undergo substance abuse treatment as a condition for receiving Work First Program or electronic food and nutrition benefits, if funds and programs are available and to the extent allowed by federal law.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.4; 2007-97, s. 4; 2008-187, s. 17.

§ 108A-25.3.
Garnishment of wages to recoup fraudulent public assistance program payment.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Disposable income. — The part of the compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise which remains after the deduction of any amounts required by law to be withheld.

Fraudulent payment. — Any public assistance program payment made because of a recipient’s false statement or representation or failure to disclose a material fact which occurs willfully and knowingly and with intent to deceive.

Garnishee. — The person, firm, association, or corporation owing compensation for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

Public assistance program. — Any means-tested benefit program administered or supervised by a county department of social services or the Department of Health and Human Services which is funded in whole or in part by federal, State, or county resources.

In any case in which a recipient or former recipient of a public assistance program, who while a recipient, obtained or benefited from a fraudulent payment, a judge of the district court in the county where the recipient or former recipient resides or is found, or in the county where the payment was made, may enter an order of garnishment to recoup a fraudulent payment after 10 days following the entry of a judgment for a sum certain for fraudulent payments pursuant to a petition filed in the action in accordance with subsection (c) of this section. Not more than twenty percent (20%) of the recipient’s or former recipient’s monthly disposable income may be garnished to recoup payment in cases of fraudulent payment. The order of garnishment shall be subject to all federal and State laws or regulations that may apply to recoupment of fraudulent payments. Garnishment shall not be a remedy under this section when the recipient or former recipient is required to pay restitution for fraudulent public assistance payments pursuant to a criminal court order.

A county department of social services or the Department of Health and Human Services may petition the court for an order of garnishment to recoup a fraudulent public assistance program payment. Garnishment shall be a remedy to recoup payment only after all administrative remedies are exhausted unsuccessfully. The petition shall be verified and provide the court with facts and circumstances of the fraudulent payment to or on behalf of the recipient or former recipient, the name and address of the garnishee, the recipient’s or former recipient’s monthly disposable income (which may be based on information and belief), and the amount sought to be garnished from the recipient’s or former recipient’s disposable income. The petition shall be served on both the recipient or former recipient and the garnishee in accordance with the provisions for service of process set forth in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4. The time period for answering or otherwise responding to process issued pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the time periods set forth in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 12.

Upon a hearing held pursuant to this section, the court may enter an order of garnishment. Provided, the court may not enter an order of garnishment if the court finds that the order jeopardizes the recipient’s or former recipient’s ability to become or remain financially self-sufficient and will result in the likelihood of an increased or recurring dependency on public assistance or an inability to secure basic necessities including, but not limited to, housing, food, health care, and utility costs. If an order of garnishment is entered, a copy of the same shall be served on both the recipient or the former recipient and the garnishee either personally or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. The order shall set forth sufficient findings of facts to support the action by the court and the amount to be garnished for each pay period. The amount garnished may be increased by an additional one dollar ($1.00) processing fee to be assessed and retained by the garnishee for each payment under the order. The order shall be subject to review for modification and dissolution upon the filing of a motion in the cause.

Upon receipt of the order of garnishment, the garnishee shall transmit without delay to the clerk of superior court the amount ordered by the court to be garnished. These funds shall be disbursed to the county department of social services to recoup fraudulent payments subject to the order of garnishment entered pursuant to this section.

A garnishee who violates the terms of an order of garnishment shall be subject to punishment for contempt.

The Social Services Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section. The rules shall ensure that a petition for an order of garnishment sought pursuant to this section is consistent with all federal and State laws and regulations.

History.

1997-443, s. 11A.122; 1997-497, s. 1.

§ 108A-25.4.
Use of payments under the Low-Income Energy Assistance Program and Crisis Intervention Program.

The Low-Income Energy Assistance Program Plan developed by the Department of Health and Human Services (Department) and submitted to the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services shall focus the annual energy assistance payments on the elderly population age 60 and above with income up to one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the federal poverty level and disabled persons receiving services through the Division of Aging and Adult Services. The energy assistance payment shall be paid directly to the service provider by the county department of social services. The Plan for Crisis Intervention Program (CIP) shall provide assistance for vulnerable populations who meet income eligibility criteria established by the Department. The CIP payment shall be paid directly to the service provider by the county department of social services and shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600.00) per household in a fiscal year.

The Department shall submit the Plan for each program to the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services no later than September 1 of each year and implement the Plan no later than October 1 of each year.

History.

2011-145, s. 10.56(a).

§ 108A-26.
Certain financial assistance and in-kind goods not considered in determining assistance paid under Chapters 108A and 111.

Financial assistance and in-kind goods or services received from a governmental agency, or from a civic or charitable organization, shall not be considered in determining the amount of assistance to be paid any person under Chapters 108A and 111 of the General Statutes provided that such financial assistance and in-kind goods and services are incorporated in the rehabilitation plan of such person being assisted by the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation Services or the Division of Services for the Blind of the Department of Health and Human Services, except where such goods and services are required to be considered by federal law or regulations.

History.

1973, c. 716; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 108A-26.1.
Information sharing of outstanding arrest warrant of applicant for or recipient of program assistance.

A county department of social services shall notify an applicant for program assistance under Part 2 or Part 5 of this Article that release of confidential information from the applicant’s records may not be protected if there exists an outstanding warrant for arrest against the applicant. A county department of social services shall notify a recipient under a program of public assistance under Part 2 or Part 5 of this Article at the time of renewal of the recipient’s application for such program assistance that release of confidential information from the recipient’s records may not be protected if there exists an outstanding warrant for arrest against the recipient.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 108A-80

, and to the extent otherwise allowed by federal and State law, a county department of social services shall ensure that the criminal history of an applicant, or of a recipient at the time of benefits renewal, is checked in a manner and to the extent necessary to verify whether an applicant for or recipient of program assistance under Part 2 or Part 5 of this Article is (i) fleeing to avoid prosecution, custody, or confinement after conviction under the laws of the place from which the individual flees, for a crime or an attempt to commit a crime, which is a felony under the laws of the place from which the individual flees, or (ii) violating a condition of probation or parole imposed under federal or State law.A criminal history check utilizing currently accessible databases shall be conducted by the county department of social services, subject to G.S. 114-19.34 and to the extent permitted by allocated county and State resources.Nothing in this section requires fingerprints to be taken of every applicant for or recipient of a program of public assistance.Counties are not required to allocate funds to comply with this section but are authorized to make such allocations on a voluntary basis.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any information otherwise protected by State or federal law or regulation.

This section applies to applicants for or recipients of program assistance under Part 2 or Part 5 of this Article only.

The Social Services Commission shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section, including rules addressing the sharing of confidential information between county departments of social services and law enforcement agencies.

The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall promote cooperation among State and local agencies to perform the functions described in this section. The Department of Health and Human Services shall cooperate and collaborate with the Office of the State Controller, the Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department of Justice, the State Bureau of Investigation, and the Department of Public Safety to develop protocols to implement this section.

Annually on April 1, each county department of social services shall report to the Department of Health and Human Services on the number of individuals who are denied benefits under this section during the preceding calendar year.

Annually on May 1, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services of the General Assembly on the number of individuals who are denied assistance under this section. The report shall include a breakdown by county.

History.

2013-417, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Reemphasizing Impracticability in the Special Needs Analysis in Response to Suspicionless Drug Testing of Welfare Recipients,” see 92 N.C. L. Rev. 948 (2014).

§ 108A-26.2.
Fleeing felon or parole or probation violator; eligibility for program assistance; federal approval; review by department.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a department of social services shall not grant public assistance under Part 2 or Part 5 of Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes if the department receives information described in

G.S. 108A-26.1

that the applicant for or recipient of program assistance is subject to arrest under an outstanding warrant arising from a charge of violating conditions of parole or probation or from a felony charge against that applicant or recipient in any jurisdiction. This section does not affect the eligibility for assistance of other members of the applicant’s or recipient’s household. An applicant or recipient described in this section is eligible for program assistance if all other eligibility criteria of the law are met when the applicant or recipient is no longer subject to arrest under an outstanding warrant as described in this section.

If federal approval is required in order to prevent the loss of federal reimbursement as a result of the application of this section to an applicant for or recipient of program assistance, the Department of Health and Human Services shall promptly take any action necessary to obtain federal approval.

History.

2013-417, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Reemphasizing Impracticability in the Special Needs Analysis in Response to Suspicionless Drug Testing of Welfare Recipients,” see 92 N.C. L. Rev. 948 (2014).

§§ 108A-26.3,
108A-26.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 108A-26.5.
NC FAST caseworker training and certification program.

The Department of Health and Human Services (Department) shall design and implement a training and certification program for caseworkers utilizing North Carolina Families Accessing Services Through Technology (NC FAST). The training and certification program shall be available on a statewide basis, and the Department shall provide training to caseworkers at county departments of social services at a location within reasonable travel distance from the county departments of social services multiples times per year. No later than 18 months after the Department has implemented the training and certification program, the Department shall require all caseworkers inputting data or making determinations for eligibility for State programs through NC FAST to be certified. A certification may last no longer than three years before an individual is required to be recertified. The Department may adopt and amend rules to implement this training and certification program.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.22(g).

Deploy Child Welfare Component of NC FAST.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9I.15(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Funds transferred from the Medicaid Transformation Reserve and allocated in Section 9B.2 of this act shall be used by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), to resume deployment of the North Carolina Families Accessing Services through Technology (NC FAST) system as it relates to case management functionality for child welfare. The Division shall deploy the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system statewide before October 1, 2022, as recommended in the Department of Health and Human Services' “Child Welfare Request for Information and Child Welfare Case Management Legislative Report,” dated September 14, 2020, and the Program Evaluation Division's Report, “NC FAST Child Welfare Case Management Software Demonstrates Adequate Functionality but Poor Usability,” dated June 12, 2020.

“(b) The Division of Social Services (Division) shall release a request for proposal (RFP) for at least one significant augmentation to the child welfare component of the NC FAST system within 30 days from the date the Division receives federal approval of its procurement plan. The Division shall enter into a contract to augment and enhance the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system within 150 days of releasing the RFP. The contract shall align with the recommendations developed by the Executive Advisory Committee within the Department, with consideration given to software currently deployed by county departments of social services.

“(b1) Of the funds allocated in accordance with this section to the Division for the child welfare component of the NC FAST system, the sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium shall be used to ensure that the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system includes the capability to automate licensing and placements, including external portals for persons applying to be foster care families and for kinship navigator programs, to:

“(1) Increase the number of foster families in North Carolina.

“(2) Expedite the licensing process.

“(3) Assist with meeting the requirements associated with the Family First Prevention Services Act.

“The Division shall release an RFP to automate licensing and placements for the child welfare component of the NC FAST system, enter into a contract for the automation, and ensure that the contract aligns with recommendations developed by the Executive Advisory Committee consistent with the time lines and requirements described in subsection (b) of this section.

“(c) Upon enactment of this section, Part III-N of S.L. 2019-240 is repealed.”